Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1516.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1799.2(a) of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1799.2. Driver improvement course discounts.(a) Motor vehicle driver improvement course.--All insurance companies authorized to write private passenger automobile insurance within this Commonwealth shall provide a premium discount for each motor vehicle on a policy under which all named insureds [are 55 years of age or older and] have successfully completed a motor vehicle driver improvement course meeting the standards of the Department of Transportation. This discount shall apply to all coverages for all policy periods beginning within the three-year period immediately following the successful completion of the course and shall be approved by the 123456789101112131415161718 commissioner as part of the insurer's rate filing, provided that such discount shall not be less than [5%] 10%. The successful completion of more than one course within a three-year period does not qualify the insured for additional discounts. The premium discount required by this subsection may be omitted upon demonstration to the commissioner in an insurer's rate filing that the discount is duplicative of a driver improvement course discount provided by the insurer.* * *Section 2. The amendment of 75 Pa.C.S. § 1799.2(a) shall apply to private passenger automobile insurance policies offered, issued or renewed in this Commonwealth on or after the effective date of this section.Section 3. This act shall take effect in six months.20250HB1516PN1777 - 2 - 1234567891011121314